Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-302
Driving off another's livestock; penalty.

Any cattle drover, or his employee, who shall drive off any neat cattle, horses, mules, or sheep belonging to another person, intentionally or through neglect, shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1879, § 2, p. 67;

R.S.1913, § 97;

C.S.1922, § 105;

C.S.1929, § 54-302;

R.S.1943, § 54-302;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 17.